Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.030

Employee suggestion program—Determination of award.

The board, or [the] board's designee, shall make the final determination as to whether an employee suggestion award will be made and shall determine the nature and extent of the award based on the payment award scale.

No employee suggestion award may normally be made to an employee for a suggestion which is within the scope of the employee's regularly assigned responsibilities.

[ 1999 c 50 s 4; 1982 c 167 s 8; 1965 ex.s. c 142 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.